data/grammar/fst/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON VnSuffixes

! "maannauju" = {maanna:maanna/1a}{u:u/1nv}{ju:juq/1vn} -- gold attests
! juq/1vn's own trailing q dropped at the bare terminal (no ending
! follows), a free spelling variant of the plain "juq" terminal above.

! "ju" (above) had only ever been tested at the bare terminal, the same
! "only tested one way" gap this project keeps re-finding -- missing its
! own continuation meant "qaujimajuinnaugatta" (needs "ju" to reach
! innaq/1nn in NnSuffixes) couldn't be found at all, confirmed via the
! real Java analyzer's own output before wiring.
++juq+1vn:juq AfterJuqTriggerSuffix ;

! "naammasaqtuit"/"naammasaqtut" need juq/1vn's own "tuq" spelling with
! ITS trailing q ALSO dropped, unlike the j->t conversion the general
! phonology.xfscript rule already produces automatically -- a SEPARATE,
! unconditional literal (not the same mechanism as "ju" above, which is
! V-context-only), confirmed via the real Java analyzer's own output
! (--pipeline) before wiring. ("qanuittuni"/"qanuittunik" superficially
! look like they'd need this too, but gold's chain for those actually
! needs the still-unimplemented "it"/3nv ending before juq -- this
! literal doesn't reach them, don't assume it does.)
++juq+1vn:tu # ;
++juq+1vn:tu NounContinuations ;

! "makkuktunut" (root "makkuk", k-final) needs "tu" with its own k
! preserved, NOT assimilated to "makkuttunut" -- same KGUARD trick as
! titut/tn-sim-p's own "inuktitut" candidate above (a parallel guarded
! path alongside the plain one, general rule still fires normally for
! whatever roots actually need it). Not decomposable by the real Java
! analyzer either (confirmed via --pipeline).
++juq+1vn:KGUARDtu # ;
++juq+1vn:KGUARDtu NounContinuations ;

! "ilinniartulirijiit" needs juq/1vn's "tu" candidate reaching a q-final
! root ("ilinniaq") with the root's own trailing q converted to r --
! same VOICE marker vik/3vn's own q-context candidate already uses
! (Endings_noun.csv's own comment on that entry documents "ilinniaq"'s
! q->r conversion directly), just not previously wired for juq/1vn's
! reduced spelling specifically.
++juq+1vn:VOICEtu NounContinuations ;

! "juq" also reaches a THIRD continuation, straight into a noun ending:
! "ajjigiinngittunik" needs it (juq -> nik/tn-acc-p) -- juq (verb-to-noun)
! had otherwise only ever continued to "#" or into another nv-suffix,
! never directly to a noun ending. Routed to a dedicated
! "NounEndingsAfterQTriggerSuffix" lexicon below (rather than the shared
! "NounEndings", where "nik" ALSO independently lives, for the general
! case): several endings' own CSV rows delete a preceding q specifically
! when the id of what precedes them is juq/1vn (or ksaq/1nn, jaq/3vn/1vn
! -- a genuinely id-conditional context, "Lever A", see
! generate_affixes.py's investigation note). Scoping it to a dedicated
! lexicon means this q-deletion stays
! specific to "reached right after one of these specific trigger
! suffixes" -- it doesn't leak into the general NounEndings case, whose
! own q-context uses a DIFFERENT mechanism (Nasalization by default).
++juq+1vn:juq NounEndingsAfterQTriggerSuffix ;


! "uqartii" needs the preceding root's own trailing q converted to r
! (VOICE) before "ji" attaches -- root "uqaq" (very common) has no
! reduced spelling of its own, so the conversion has to happen on ji's
! side, same VOICE-prefixed-candidate shape as juq/1vn's own "VOICEtu"
! elsewhere in this file. The literal is "ti" (own j ALREADY converted
! to t), not "ji" -- VOICE resolves early in phonology.xfscript's rule
! cascade, well BEFORE the general j->t rule at the very top, so
! "VOICEji" would never actually see "r" adjacent to "j" in time for
! that rule to fire (confirmed via a failed hfst-lookup attempt with
! "VOICEji" first: produced "uqarjii", j unconverted). Baking the t
! directly into the literal sidesteps the ordering issue entirely, same
! as juq/1vn's own "VOICEtu" already does. Not decomposable by the real
! Java analyzer either (confirmed via --pipeline).
++ji+1vn:VOICEti NounContinuations ;


! "ut"/1vn ("object/instrument/tool for doing s.t."): Suffixes.csv's
! V-form alone lists 12 space-separated candidates. Tracing every gold
! word's FULL decomposition chain instead shows it's the same "CSV under/
! over-lists, gold reveals the real literal-spelling set" shape as usiq
! above, just with MORE candidates because "ut" genuinely has three
! parallel sub-families, not one:
!   - V-context, own trailing q handled by SUPPR (root already q-final,
!     e.g. "ikajuq"): SUPPRut (bare terminal, "ikajuutit"), SUPPRuti
!     (continuing), SUPPRutik (alt bare terminal), SUPPRutaq (alt bare
!     terminal, own q survives unless a FOLLOWING SUPPR-marked ending eats
!     it -- "iksivautaq" bare vs "iksivautaup" via up/tn-gen-s's own SUPPR,
!     same "downstream SUPPR reduces utaq->uta for free" trick as usiq).
!   - q-prefix family (preceding root's own q is KEPT, doubled "qq" --
!     "apiq" family): qut/quti/qutik, no SUPPR at all, mirrors usiq's
!     qusiq/qusi/qusir treatment exactly.
!   - r-prefix family (preceding root's own trailing q IS deleted, by
!     ut's OWN SUPPR -- "giaq"/1vv and "liuq"/1nv's output): SUPPRrut
!     (bare terminal, "ilagiarut"), SUPPRruti (continuing,
!     "ilagiaruti"/"qaujigiarutit" -- "qaujigiarutit" needs bare SUPPRrut
!     + it, not SUPPRruti; both "rut"+it and "ruti"+it are gold-attested
!     free variants, same "apiqqutit"/"apiqqutiit" doubling seen in the
!     q-prefix family too).
!   - V-context gemination family: the CSV's own V-form actually lists
!     "jjut jjuti jjutik jjutaq" a SECOND time via action1 "i(jj)"
!     (Insertion of doubled "j") -- this IS the "mysterious jj-prefixed
!     spelling" this comment used to describe as "not in the CSV's own
!     candidate list at all" (round 22-era investigation missed it,
!     mistaking it for the separate, genuinely distinct "jjut"/1vn
!     suffix, Suffixes.csv nb=1 "reason/cause/motive", instead). Baked
!     directly into the literal text (same "unconditional insertion"
!     treatment as lugu/lugit's own "i(l)" case), not a marker: confirmed
!     against the REAL Java analyzer's own output (`{jjuti:ut/1vn}` for
!     "aulajjutinut") before wiring, not guessed. The plain (ungeminated)
!     "gut/guti/gutik/gutaq" V-context family (same row, action1 "n") is
!     wired alongside it for the same reason -- different strings, no
!     collision, gold may need either.
! NOT attempted (each a separate, smaller gap, not blocked by "ut"
! itself): "tn-nom-s-1s"/"ga" and "tn-nom-d"/"a-k" (whole unimplemented
! endings, block "apiqqutiga"/"iksivautaa" families); "ssaq"/"tsaq"
! spelling variants of ksaq/1nn (blocks "apiqqutissait"/
! "apiqqutitsait"); a bare "p"-only candidate for up/tn-gen-s (blocks
! "iksivautap"); "matu"+"iq"/1nv's own chain (blocks "matuirutimut",
! unverified whether iq/1nv even reaches here yet); "atiliurutausimajut"
! (already blocked upstream by liuq/1nv's unimplemented third spelling,
! see liuq's own comment below); "katimautiminingit"/"katimautinik"/
! "katimautitsa" and "naasautaa"/"naasautiit"/"naasautik"/"naasautilik"
! and "parnaut"/"parnautiit"/"parnautinik" and "uqaalautaa" and
! "uuktutigilugu" family -- all involve roots or preceding suffixes
! ("naasaq"/1v, "parnaq"/1v, "allak"/1vv, "uuk"+"tuq"/1vv chains) not
! individually re-verified; likely mostly reachable already given "ut"'s
! mechanism is now in place, worth re-checking with
! next_affix_priority.py/full_corpus_check.py rather than assumed
! working.
++ut+1vn:SUPPRuta # ;
++ut+1vn:SUPPRuta NounContinuations ;

! "saqqitaujuq" family (root "saqqik", k-final): "taq" above still spells
! its own trailing q, but the general (unmarked) k->t assimilation rule
! ALSO fires on the newly-created root-k/suffix-t boundary once "taq"
! attaches, over-applying into a spurious geminate ("saqqittaq" instead
! of gold's "saqqitaq") -- confirmed via direct hfst-lookup before
! wiring. What's actually needed is SUPPR (delete the root's own final
! k first) plus jaq's own q ALSO dropped ("ta"), the same shape as this
! round's juq/1vn "tu" fix -- avoids the k/t boundary ever forming, so
! the blanket rule has nothing to over-fire on.
++jaq+1vn:SUPPRta NounContinuations ;
++jaq+1vn:SUPPRta # ;

! "vik"/3vn ("place where the action of the verb happens"): q-context:
! "ilinniarvik" = {ilinniar:ilinniaq/1v}{vik:vik/3vn}, root's own
! trailing q rewritten to r (Voicing, same "marker-scoped rewrite" shape
! as NASAL but its own table -- new VOICE marker, phonology.xfscript).
! Only the q-context (single candidate, Voicing) and the terminal/
! NounEndings paths are wired: V-context is a genuine 2-candidate
! ambiguity (Suffixes.csv V-form "vik vik", action "i(p) n", no
! disambiguator) and k-context has TWO gold-attested surface variants for
! the same underlying word ("ikupigvilirijikkut" vs "ikupivvilirijikkut")
! which look like genuine dialectal alternates, not modeled here -- both
! left deferred rather than guessed at. Also gained an NvSuffixes
! continuation, needed for "aanniaviliaqtunut" (...+vi(vik/3vn)+
! liaq(2nv)+tu(juq/1vn)+nut) -- NOT reused via the existing VOICE-marked
! candidate: "aanniaq"(q-final) needs its own q DELETED here (SUPPR), not
! converted to r like "ilinniarvik" needed -- root-specific free
! variation, same as elsewhere in this file. "SUPPRvi" also bakes in
! vik's own trailing k already dropped (needed directly before liaq, a
! plain literal with no SUPPR of its own).
++vik+3vn:SUPPRvi NounContinuations ;

! "vv"-doubled spellings of "vik" (own "v" geminated instead of the
! preceding consonant being voiced/deleted). The plain "vvik"/"vvi"
! variants are now redundant (removed, 0 gold words lost -- covered by
! the generator). The SUPPR-prefixed k-deleting variants stay:
! "ikupivvilirijikkut"/"ikupivvilirijikkunnut" need the preceding root's
! own k gone before the geminated "vv" (a cross-boundary q/k deletion,
! see the Friday note in the memory log).
++vik+3vn:SUPPRvvik NounContinuations ;
++vik+3vn:SUPPRvvi NounContinuations ;

LEXICON NounEndingsAfterQTriggerSuffix

! "nut"/tn-dat-p ("ajjigiinngittunut", same trigger list) and
! "tigut"/tn-via-p ("avittuqsimajutigut", same juq trigger). tigut's OWN
! CSV row files this conditional under its k-form column, not q --
! almost certainly a data-entry quirk (juq/1vn always surfaces q-final in
! every one of ITS OWN contexts, so a following morpheme can never see it
! as literally k-final), not a real k-context; implemented by what the
! mechanism clearly IS (juq-triggered Suppression), not by the column
! label, and confirmed correct against the one gold word that exercises
! it.
++tigut+tn-via-p:SUPPRtigut # ;
